Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
206E

HAWAII
COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY

Part I. General Provisions

Section

206E-1 Findings and purpose

206E-2 Definitions

206E-3 Hawaii community development authority;
established

206E-4 Powers; generally

206E-4.1 Assignment of powers and duties
prohibited

206E-4.5 Urban gardening programs

206E-5 Designation of community development
districts;

community development plans

206E-5.5 Community and public notice requirements;
posting

on the authority's website; required

206E-5.6 Public hearing for decision-making;
separate

hearings required; contested case
hearing;

judicial review

206E-6 District-wide improvement program

206E-7 Community development rules

206E-8 Use of public lands; acquisition of state
lands

206E-8.5 Developments within special management
areas and

shoreline setback

206E-9 Acquisition of real property from a
county

206E-10 Condemnation of real property

206E-10.5 Relocation

206E-11 Construction contracts

206E-12 Dedication for public facilities as
condition to

development

206E-13 Public projects

206E-14 Sale or lease of redevelopment projects

206E-15 Residential projects; cooperative
agreements

206E-16 Hawaii community development revolving
fund

206E-16.5 Expenditures of revolving funds under the
authority

exempt from appropriation and allotment

206E-17 Exemption from taxation

206E-18 Assistance by state and county agencies

206E-19 Annual report

206E-20 Court proceedings; preferences; venue

206E-21 Issuance of bonds

206E-22 Violations and penalty

Part II. Kakaako Community Development
District

206E-31 Kakaako community development district;
purposes

206E-31.5 Prohibitions

206E-31.6 Lease of projects

206E-32 District; established, boundaries

206E-33 Kakaako community development district;
development

guidance policies

206E-34 Cultural public market

206E-35 Repealed

Part III. Reserved Housing Loan Programs

206E-101 Definitions

206E-102 Rules; eligible loans

206E-103 Revenue bonds; authorization

206E-104 Revenue bonds; payment and security

206E-105 Revenue bonds; interest rate, price, and
sale

206E-106 Revenue bonds; investment of proceeds,
and redemption

206E-107 Trustee; designation, duties

206E-108 Trust indenture

206E-109 Repealed

206E-110 Reserved housing loan programs;
procedures and

requirements

206E-111 Reserved housing loan programs; general
powers

206E-112 Reserved housing loan programs; self
supporting

206E-113 Reserved housing loan programs; fees

206E-114 Reserved housing loan programs; evidence
of eligible

loan or eligible project loan

206E-115 Loans to lenders program

206E-116 Loan to lenders program; collateral
security

206E-117 Purchase of existing loans program

206E-118 Advance commitments program

206E-119 Eligible loan and eligible project loan
funding

program

206E-120 Loans; service and custody

206E-121 Loans; sale, pledge, or assignment

206E-122 Loans; insurance and guarantees

206E-123 Loans; default

Part IV. Revenue Bonds for Public Facility
Projects--

Repealed

206E-151 to 159 Repealed

Part V. Hamakua Community Development
District--

Repealed

206E-171 to 173 Repealed

Part VI. Special Facility Projects

206E-181 Definitions

206E-182 Powers

206E-183 Findings and determination for special
facility

leases

206E-184 Special facility lease

206E-185 Special facility revenue bonds

206E-186 Special facility revenue bonds; special
funds

Part VII. Kalaeloa Community Development
District

206E-191 Barbers Point Naval Air Station redevelopment;

power to redevelop established

206E-192 Designation of the Kalaeloa community
development

district

206E-193 District established; boundaries

206E-194 Kalaeloa community development district;

development guidance policies

206E-195 Kalaeloa community development revolving
fund

206E-196 Assessment for operating costs

206E-197 Complaints

206E-198 Remedies

206E-199 Reports

Part VIII. Heeia Community Development
District

206E-201 Definitions

206E-202 District established; boundaries

206E-203 Heeia community development district;
policies

to guide development

206E-204 Heeia community development revolving
fund

206E-205 Rules; adoption

Note

Kakaako makai; conveyance of certain parcels to office of
Hawaiian affairs. L 2012, c 15.

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next